North Carolina, session 2025, SB481.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Subdivisions (17a) and (41b) of G.S. 130A-290(a) are recodified as
subdivisions (17b) and (41c), respectively, of that subsection.
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 130A-290, as amended by subsection (a) of this section, reads
as rewritten:
"§ 130A-290. Definitions.
(a) Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following definitions shall
apply throughout this Article:
…
(17a) "Mass balance attribution" means an auditable chain of custody accounting
methodology pursuant to a third-party certification system that enables the
manufacturer to attribute quantities of feedstocks to one or more recycled
products.
…
(24a) "Recycled products" or "recycled product" means products that are produced
from recyclable material and via mass balance attribution for chemical
recycling processes. The designation of a product as a "recycled product" does
not exempt the product from otherwise applicable air, water, or hazardous
waste statutory or regulatory requirements.
…
(41b) "Third-party certification system" means an international and multi-national
third-party certification system that consists of a set of rules for the
implementation of mass balance attribution methodologies for the recycling
of materials.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S481-v-1*